Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-517
Theft by receiving stolen property.

A person commits theft if he receives, retains, or disposes of stolen movable property of another knowing that it has been stolen, or believing that it has been stolen, unless the property is received, retained, or disposed with intention to restore it to the owner.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 116.

In a prosecution for receiving stolen property, the court must instruct the jury on the subjective standard of "knowing . . . or believing" as it is used in this section. State v. Almasaudi, 282 Neb. 162, 802 N.W.2d 110 (2011).

This section imposes a subjective standard of knowledge or belief. State v. Almasaudi, 282 Neb. 162, 802 N.W.2d 110 (2011).

Read in conjunction with section 28-510, theft by receiving stolen property under this section is the same offense as theft by unlawful taking under section 28-511. State v. Miner, 273 Neb. 837, 733 N.W.2d 891 (2007).

The Nebraska Legislature has unambiguously defined theft as a single offense which can be committed in several different ways. State v. Miner, 273 Neb. 837, 733 N.W.2d 891 (2007).

The Nebraska Legislature has not made the offense of "theft by receiving" a continuous offense. State v. Nuss, 235 Neb. 107, 454 N.W.2d 482 (1990).

Applying subsection (8) of section 25-518, value is an essential element of the crime of theft by receiving stolen property. In re Interest of Shea B., 3 Neb. App. 750, 532 N.W.2d 52 (1995).